District of Columbia statutes.
4-105

Director of Public Welfare.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia, upon the nomination of the Board, is hereby authorized to appoint a Director of Public Welfare, which position is hereby authorized and created, who shall be the chief executive officer of the Board and shall be charged, subject to its general supervision, with the executive and administrative duties provided for in this act. The Director shall be a person of such training, experience, and capacity as will especially qualify him or her to discharge the duties of the office. The Director of Public Welfare may be discharged by the Mayor of the District of Columbia upon recommendation of the Board. The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized, upon the nomination of the Board, to appoint such personnel as may be necessary for the efficient performance of the duties of the Board.

History

Mar. 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58, § 5
Dec. 20, 1941, 55 Stat. 849, ch. 605, § 1
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(ss), 25 DCR 5740

Cross References

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.
Prostitution, duties of Director concerning persons found guilty, see § 22-2703.
Regulations, protection of life, health, and property, Council and Mayor, authorization to make and enforce, see § 1-303.03.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-105.
1973 Ed., § 3-105.

References in Text

“This act,” referred to at the end of the first sentence in this section, means the Act of March 16, 1926, 44 Stat. 209, ch. 58.

Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.